Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 2. Dissolution of Marriage.

Cross references. —

For interaction between ch. 260, SLA 1976 and court rules in effect at that time, see § 2, ch. 260, SLA 1976, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Collateral references. —

24 Am. Jur. 2d Divorce and Separation, § 1 et seq.

Dissolution of marriage on statutory ground of incompatibility, 19 Am. Jur. POF2d, pp. 221-238.

27A C.J.S., Divorce, § 21 et seq.

Fault as consideration in alimony, spousal support, or property division awards pursuant to no fault divorce, 86 ALR3d 1116.

What constitutes “incompatibility” within statute specifying it as substantive ground for divorce, 97 ALR3d 989.

Sec. 25.24.200.
Dissolution of marriage.

A husband and wife together may petition the superior court for the dissolution of their marriage under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

if the following conditions exist at the time of filing the petition:

incompatibility of temperament has caused the irremediable breakdown of the marriage;

if there are unmarried children of the marriage under the age of 19 or the wife is pregnant, and the spouses have agreed on which spouse or third party is to be awarded custody of each minor child of the marriage and the extent of visitation, including visitation by grandparents and other persons if in the child’s best interests, and support to be provided on the children’s behalf, whether the payments are to be made through the child support services agency, and the tax consequences of that agreement;

the spouses have agreed as to the distribution of all real and personal property that is jointly owned or community property under AS 34.77, including retirement benefits and the payment of spousal maintenance, if any, and the tax consequences resulting from these payments; the agreement must be fair and just and take into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(2)

and (4) so that the economic effect of dissolution is fairly allocated; and

the spouses have agreed as to the payment of all unpaid obligations incurred by either or both of them and as to payment of obligations incurred jointly in the future.

A husband or wife may separately petition for dissolution of their marriage under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

if the following conditions exist at the time of filing the petition:

incompatibility of temperament, as evidenced by extended absence or otherwise, has caused the irremediable breakdown of the marriage;

the petitioning spouse has been unable to ascertain the other spouse’s position in regard to the dissolution of their marriage and in regard to the fair and just division of property, including retirement benefits, spousal maintenance, payment of debts, and custody, support and visitation because the whereabouts of the other spouse is unknown to the petitioning spouse after reasonable efforts have been made to locate the absent spouse; and

the other spouse cannot be personally served with process inside or outside the state.

Except as provided in AS

25.24.220(i)

, a spouse who has been personally served with a copy of a petition filed under (a) of this section may execute an appearance, waiver of time to answer, and waiver of notice of hearing. The appearance and waivers must include an acknowledgment signed before an officer authorized to administer an oath or affirmation that the spouse being served has read the petition; assents to the terms relating to custody of the children, child support, visitation, spousal maintenance taking into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(2)

, and tax consequences, division of property, including retirement benefits and taking into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(4)

, ownership of animals, taking into consideration the well-being of the animals, and allocation of debts; agrees that the conditions otherwise required by (a) of this section exist; agrees that the petition constitutes the entire agreement between the parties; understands fully the nature and consequences of the action; and is not signing the appearance and waivers under duress or coercion.

The action created under this section is separate from the action created by AS

25.24.010

. The procedures prescribed by AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

do not apply to an action brought under AS

25.24.010

, nor do procedures prescribed under AS 25.24.010 —

25.24.180

apply to an action filed under this section, except as specifically provided.

Spousal maintenance and a division of property must fairly allocate the economic effect of dissolution and take into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(2)

and (4).

A petition filed under (a) or (b) of this section may, if an animal is owned by a husband and wife together, provide for the ownership or joint ownership of the animal. The ownership or joint ownership of an animal provided for in a petition under (a) or (b) of this section must take into consideration the well-being of the animal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 260 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 1982; am §§ 8, 9 ch 130 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 1998; am §§
20, 21 ch 60 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

09.55.231

. Renumbered in 1983. The reference to “ AS 34.77” in paragraph (a)(3) was substituted for “ AS 34.75” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the chapter.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, in (c), in the second sentence, inserted “ownership of animals, taking into consideration the well-being of the animals,” preceding “and allocation of debts”; added (f).

Cross references. —

For jurisdiction of court to consider child custody, see AS

25.30.300

.

Sec. 25.24.210.
Petition for dissolution.

The caption in a petition for dissolution of marriage under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

shall be styled substantially “In the Matter of the Dissolution of the Marriage of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . and . . . . . . . . . . . . ..”

The petition shall be filed with the superior court and shall either

recite that the conditions enumerated under AS

25.24.200(a)

exist and shall be signed and verified by both of the petitioners or by one petitioner, if that petitioner personally serves the petition on the other spouse in accordance with the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure in anticipation that the spouse will comply with AS

25.24.200(c)

; or

recite that the conditions enumerated under AS

25.24.200(b)

exist and be signed and verified by one of the petitioners.

The petition shall state that the spouse or spouses executing the petition consent to the jurisdiction of the court.

The petition shall request that the marriage be dissolved and that the name of a spouse be changed, if desired by that spouse.

If the petition is filed by both spouses under AS

25.24.200(a)

, the petition must state in detail the terms of the agreement between the spouses concerning the custody of children, child support in terms of periodic payments and in terms of health care expenses, visitation, spousal maintenance and tax consequences, if any, and fair and just division of property, including retirement benefits. A petition filed by both spouses under AS

25.24.200(a)

may provide for the ownership or joint ownership of an animal, taking into consideration the well-being of the animal. Agreements on spousal maintenance and property division must fairly allocate the economic effect of dissolution and take into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(2)

and (4). In addition, the petition must state

the respective occupations of the petitioners;

the income, assets, and liabilities of the respective petitioners at the time of filing the petition;

the date and place of the marriage;

the name, date of birth, and current marital, educational, and custodial status of each child born of the marriage or adopted by the petitioners who is under the age of 19;

whether the wife is pregnant;

whether either petitioner requires medical care or treatment;

whether any of the following has been issued or filed during the marriage by or regarding either spouse as defendant, participant, or respondent:

a criminal charge of a crime involving domestic violence;

a protective order under AS

18.66.100

-

18.66.180

;

injunctive relief under former AS

25.35.010

or 25.35.020; or

a protective order issued in another jurisdiction and recognized in this state under AS

18.66.140

;

whether either petitioner has received the advice of legal counsel regarding a divorce or dissolution;

other facts and circumstances that the petitioners believe should be considered;

that the petition constitutes the entire agreement between the petitioners; and

any other relief sought by the petitioners.

A petition filed under this section must include or be accompanied by a record of the social security numbers, if ascertainable, of the following persons:

both spouses to the marriage being dissolved;

each child whose rights are being addressed in the petition for dissolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 260 SLA 1976; am §§ 10, 11 ch 130 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 117 SLA 1992; am § 48 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 45 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 15, 16 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 106 SLA 2000; am § 22 ch 60 SLA 2016; am § 21 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 09.55.232. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For effect of the 1990 amendment to (d) of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 84(a), see § 20, ch. 130, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For effect of amendments to this section made by ch. 87, SLA 1997 on court rules, see § 151, ch. 87, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments to this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, in (e), inserted the second sentence of the introductory language.

The 2017 amendment, effective September 17, 2017, in (e)(7)(D), substituted “recognized in this state” for “filed with the court in this state”.

Sec. 25.24.220.
Hearing.

After a petition for dissolution is filed under the provisions of AS

25.24.210

, a hearing shall be scheduled in accordance with the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

Except as provided in (i) of this section, if the petition is filed by both spouses under AS

25.24.200(a)

, both spouses shall attend the hearing personally and not through counsel. However, if the petition is not subject to (i) of this section, a spouse who complies with AS

25.24.200(c)

is not required to attend the hearing. Either spouse may have counsel at the hearing.

If the petition is filed by one spouse under AS

25.24.200(b)

, that spouse shall submit proof of diligent inquiry as to the whereabouts of the absent spouse and provide notice by publication, posting, or other means as ordered by the court under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

If the petition is filed by both spouses under AS

25.24.200(a)

, the court shall examine the petitioners or petitioner present and consider whether

the spouses fully understand the nature and consequences of their action;

the written agreements between the spouses concerning child custody, child support, and visitation are just as between the spouses and in the best interests of the children of the marriage; in determining whether the parents’ agreement on visitation is in the best interests of the children under this paragraph, the court shall also consider whether the agreement should include visitation by grandparents and other persons;

the written agreements between the spouses relating to the division of property, including retirement benefits, spousal maintenance, and the allocation of obligations are just; the spousal maintenance and division of property must fairly allocate the economic effect of dissolution and take into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(2)

and (4);

the written agreements constitute the entire agreement between the parties;

the conditions in AS

25.24.200(a)

have been met; and

the written agreements between the spouses concerning ownership or joint ownership of an animal take into consideration the well-being of the animal.

If the petition is filed by one spouse under AS

25.24.200(b)

, the court shall examine the petitioner and consider whether the petitioner fully understands the nature and consequences of the action and whether the conditions in AS

25.24.200(b)

have been met.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the child. Appointment of a guardian ad litem or attorney for the child shall be made under the terms of AS

25.24.310

.

The court may amend the written agreements between the spouses relating to child custody, child support, visitation, division of the property, including retirement benefits, spousal maintenance, ownership or joint ownership of an animal, taking into consideration the well-being of the animal, and allocation of obligations, but only if both petitioners concur in the amendment in writing or on the record.

In its examination of a petitioner under (d) of this section, the court shall use a heightened level of scrutiny of agreements if

one party is represented by counsel and the other is not;

there is evidence that a party committed a crime involving domestic violence during the marriage or if any of the following has been issued or filed during the marriage by or regarding either spouse as defendant, participant, or respondent:

a criminal charge of a crime involving domestic violence;

a protective order under AS

18.66.100

-

18.66.180

;

injunctive relief under former AS

25.35.010

or 25.35.020; or

a protective order issued in another jurisdiction and recognized in this state under AS

18.66.140

;

there is a minor child of the marriage; or

there is a patently inequitable division of the marital estate.

If the court finds that a higher level of scrutiny is required by (h) of this section, the court shall examine the written agreements between the spouses to determine that they are just, that they constitute the entire agreement between the parties, and that the agreements concerning child custody, child support, and visitation are in the best interest of the children of the marriage, if any. The court shall require the presence of both spouses at a hearing for this purpose unless the court finds on the record that it would constitute a significant hardship on one of the spouses to appear and that a just agreement has been reached. If one of the spouses cannot attend the hearing because it would constitute a significant hardship, the court may require that spouse to be available by telephone to answer questions, at that spouse’s expense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 260 SLA 1976; am §§ 12—17 ch 130 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 30 SLA 1995; am § 49 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§
23, 24 ch 60 SLA 2016; am § 22 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS 09.55.233. Renumbered in 1983.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, added (d)(6) and made a related change; in (g), inserted “ownership or joint ownership of an animal, taking into consideration the well-being of the animal,” following “spousal maintenance,”.

The 2017 amendment, effective September 17, 2017, in (h)(2)(D), substituted “recognized in this state” for “filed with the court in this state”.

Sec. 25.24.230.
Judgment.

If the petition is filed under AS

25.24.200(a)

, and is not subject to AS

25.24.220(h)

, the court may grant the spouses a final decree of dissolution and shall order other relief as provided in this section if the court, upon consideration of the information contained in the petition and the testimony of the spouse or spouses at the hearing, finds that

the spouses understand fully the nature and consequences of their action;

the written agreements between the spouses concerning spousal maintenance and tax consequences, if any, division of property, including retirement benefits, and allocation of obligations are fair and just and constitute the entire agreement between the parties;

the spousal maintenance and division of property fairly allocate the economic effect of dissolution and take into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(2)

and (4);

each spouse entered into the agreement voluntarily and free from the coercion of another person;

the conditions in AS

25.24.200(a)

have been met; and

the written agreements between the spouses concerning ownership or joint ownership of an animal take into consideration the well-being of the animal.

If the petition is filed under AS

25.24.200(a)

and is subject to AS

25.24.220(h)

, the court may grant the spouses a final decree of dissolution and shall order other relief as provided in this section if the court, upon consideration of the information contained in the petition and the testimony of the spouse or spouses at the hearing, finds that

the spouses understand fully the nature and consequences of their action;

the written agreements between the spouses concerning child custody, child support, and visitation are in the best interest of the children of the marriage, constitute the entire agreement of the parties on child custody, child support, and visitation and, as between the spouses, are just;

the written agreements between the spouses concerning spousal maintenance and tax consequences, if any, division of property, including retirement benefits, and allocation of obligations are just and constitute the entire agreement between the parties;

the spousal maintenance and division of property fairly allocate the economic effect of dissolution and take into consideration the factors listed in AS

25.24.160(a)(2)

and (4);

each spouse entered the agreement voluntarily and free from the coercion of another person; and

the conditions in AS

25.24.200(a)

have been met.

If the petition is filed by one spouse under AS

25.24.200(b)

, the court may grant the spouse a final decree of dissolution and change the petitioner’s name, if so requested, if the court, upon consideration of affidavits supplied by the spouse and the testimony of the spouse at the hearing, finds that

the spouse present at the hearing understands fully the nature and consequences of the action;

the conditions in AS

25.24.200(b)

have been met; and

the requirements of AS

25.24.165(b)

have been satisfied, if a change of name is requested.

The court shall dismiss a petition or continue action on a petition filed under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

before findings are made if

a representative of the unmarried children who are under the age of 19 objects to a term of an agreement between the spouses;

either of the spouses withdraws from an agreement required under AS

25.24.200(a)

; or

the petition alleges that the conditions in AS

25.24.200(b)

exist, but the whereabouts of the absent spouse becomes known to the other spouse or the court before findings are made.

The court shall deny the relief sought in a petition filed under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

if the court does not make the findings required under (a) — (c) of this section.

If the petition is filed by both spouses under AS

25.24.200(a)

, the court shall change either spouse’s name, if the spouse seeking a change of name to a name other than a prior name complies with AS

25.24.165(b)

, and shall fully and specifically set out in the decree the written agreements of the spouses and shall order the performance of those written agreements. The court shall also state, in the decree, whether child support payments are to be made through the child support services agency. If the petition is filed by one spouse under AS

25.24.200(b)

, the decree must state that it does not bar future action on the issues not resolved in the decree.

Notwithstanding other provisions of AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

, the court may not award to one spouse real or personal property acquired by the other spouse before the date of the marriage, unless the spouses expressly agree otherwise or the court determines that the property should be made available, by sale or other conveyance, to ensure that the best interests of the children are provided for. If the court determines that the best interests of the children require an award of premarital property, but the spouses do not agree, the court shall dismiss or continue the action.

If a judgment under this section distributes benefits to an alternate payee under AS 14.25, AS

21.51.120(a)

, AS

21.54.020(c)

,

21.54.050(c)

, AS 22.25, AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.226

, or AS 39.35, the judgment must meet the requirements of a qualified domestic relations order under the definition of that phrase that is applicable to those provisions.

For each judgment issued under this section, the court shall include in the records relating to the matter the social security numbers, if ascertainable, of the following persons:

each party to the dissolution of marriage;

each child whose rights are addressed in the judgment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 260 SLA 1976; am § 28 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 130 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 133 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 117 SLA 1992; am § 46 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 17 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 52 SLA 2001; am § 47 ch 80 SLA 2006; am § 25 ch 60 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 09.55.234. Renumbered in 1983.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (f) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For action for failure to permit visitation, see AS

25.20.140

; for jurisdiction of court to make child custody determination, see AS 25.30.020(a); for effect of the 1990 amendments to (c) and (f) of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 84(a), see § 20, ch. 130, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for other provisions relating to court-ordered child support, see AS

25.24.910

and AS

25.27.060

—

25.27.070

; for administratively-ordered child support, see AS 25.27; for court rule determining amount of child support, see Rule 90.3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. For effect of amendments to this section made by ch. 87, SLA 1997 on court rules, see § 151, ch. 87, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, added (a)(6), and made related changes.

Sec. 25.24.232.
Children as dependents for tax purposes.

Notwithstanding other provisions of AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

, the court may not grant a final decree of dissolution that incorporates an agreement between the parties if the agreement unconditionally entitles a noncustodial parent to claim a child as a dependent under federal income tax laws. The court may incorporate into the decree of dissolution an agreement between the parties that entitles a noncustodial parent to claim a child as a dependent under federal tax laws for a tax year if the noncustodial parent satisfies the requirements of federal law and was not in arrears at the end of the tax year in an amount more than four times the monthly obligation under

a support order applicable to the child in cases where a payment schedule has not been established for payment of continuing support and accumulated arrears under the support order; or

a payment schedule if a payment schedule has been established for payment of continuing support and accumulated arrears under a support order applicable to the child.

In this section, “noncustodial parent” means the parent who has actual physical custody of the child for less time than the other parent.

History.

(§ 18 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.24.240.
Effect and modification of decree.

A decree of dissolution issued under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

shall have the same force and effect as a decree granted under AS

25.24.010

—

25.24.180

.

A decree of dissolution granted under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

may be modified or enlarged as prescribed by AS

25.24.150

—

25.24.170

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 260 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.235. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 25.24.250.
Forms.

The Department of Law, in cooperation with the administrator of the Alaska Court System, shall prepare forms and instructions for use by persons wishing to obtain a dissolution of their marriage under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

and wishing to utilize the services of the child support services agency. The forms shall conform to the requirements of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, except that information appearing on the forms in legible handwriting shall be acceptable.

Forms prepared under (a) of this section shall be made available to the public at each office of the division of social services of the Department of Health and Social Services, and every superior court, and wherever else considered necessary by the Department of Law.

Forms or instructions prepared under (a) of this section must specify that the dissolution petition constitutes the entire agreement between the parties and must provide examples of kinds of property and obligations that are subject to distribution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 260 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 130 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.236. Renumbered in 1983.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 25.24.260.
Right to file action for divorce.

No spouse may be precluded from filing an action for divorce under AS

25.24.010

—

25.24.180

upon dismissal or denial of a petition filed under AS

25.24.200

—

25.24.260

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 260 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.237. Renumbered in 1983.